Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202644-7,118
Coverage for services performed by rural emergency hospital; requirements.

Any individual or group sickness and accident insurance policy or subscriber contract, nonprofit hospital or medical service policy or plan contract, or health maintenance organization contract and any self-funded employee benefit plan to the extent not preempted by federal law or exempted by state law shall provide benefits for services when performed by a licensed rural emergency hospital if such services would be covered under such policies, contracts, or coverage if performed by a general hospital.

Laws 2022, LB697, § 8.